Maryland, session 2025, SB0660.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
12–202.
(a) (1) Subject to the provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection and
subsection (b) of this section, in any proceeding to establish or modify child support,
whether pendente lite or permanent, the court shall use the child support guidelines set
forth in this subtitle.
(2) (i) There is a rebuttable presumption that the amount of child
support which would result from the application of the child support guidelines set forth in
this subtitle is the correct amount of child support to be awarded.
(ii) The presumption may be rebutted by evidence that the
application of the guidelines would be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0660*

SENATE BILL 660
(iii) In determining whether the application of the guidelines would
be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case, the court may consider:
1. the terms of any existing separation or property
settlement agreement or court order, including any provisions for payment of mortgages or
marital debts, payment of college education expenses, the terms of any use and possession
order or right to occupy the family home under an agreement, any direct payments made
for the benefit of the children required by agreement or order, or any other financial
considerations set out in an existing separation or property settlement agreement or court
order;
2. the presence in the household of either parent of other
children to whom that parent owes a duty of support and the expenses for whom that parent
is directly contributing; and
3. whether an obligor’s monthly child support obligation
would leave the obligor with a monthly actual income below 110% of the 2019 federal
poverty level for an individual.
(iv) The presumption may not be rebutted solely on the basis of
evidence of the presence in the household of either parent of other children to whom that
parent owes a duty of support and the expenses for whom that parent is directly
contributing.
(V) THERE IS A PRESUMPTION THAT THE APPLICATION OF THE
GUIDELINES TO AN AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE PARENTS THAT DEPARTS FROM THE
GUIDELINES WOULD BE UNJUST OR INAPPROPRIATE IF THE PARENTS MUTUALLY
ASSERT THAT THE AGREEMENT IS IN THE BEST INTEREST OF THE CHILD.
[(v)] (VI) 1. If the court determines that the application of the
guidelines would be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case, the court shall make a
written finding or specific finding on the record stating the reasons for departing from the
guidelines.
2. The court’s finding shall state:
A. the amount of child support that would have been required
under the guidelines;
B. how the order varies from the guidelines;
C. how the finding serves the best interests of the child; and
D. in cases in which items of value are conveyed instead of a
portion of the support presumed under the guidelines, the estimated value of the items
conveyed.

SENATE BILL 660 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.